West Virginia, session 2025, HB2331.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Office of Miners’ Health, Safety, and Training. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on November 7, 2024, authorized under the authority of §22A-10-3 of this code, relating to the Office of Miners' Health, Safety, and Training (certification, recertification, and training of EMT-Miners and the certification of EMT-M instructors, 56 CSR 22), is authorized. §64-10-2. Division of Natural Resources. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on September 3, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-2-11 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (transporting and selling wildlife parts and pelts, 58 CSR 16), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-7-13 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (boating, 58 CSR 25), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-7-13 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (special boating, 58 CSR 26), is authorized. (d) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-5-2 of this code, modified by the Division of Natural Resources to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 3, 2024, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (public use of campgrounds in West Virginia State Parks and State Forests and Campsites in State Rail Trails under the Division of Natural Resources, 58 CSR 32), is authorized with the following amendment:  	On page 1, by striking out all of subsection 2.2. and inserting in lieu thereof a new subsection 2.2. to read as follows: 2.2. A person who is 18 years of age or older must be at each rented campsite and is responsible for the actions and safety of all campsite occupants and shall be held liable for any damages caused by campsite occupants. Except that, at the discretion of the area superintendent, adjacent campsites occupied by youth organization groups may be considered supervised by a single person who is 18 years of age or older; And, On page 2, by striking out all of subsection 2.5. and inserting in lieu thereof a new subsection 2.5. to read as follows: 2.5. No more than two motor vehicles are permitted on a campsite at any time. No more than one camping unit (tent, trailer, motor home, camper van, etc.) is permitted on a campsite; Provided, That a family camping group or youth organization group, at the discretion of the area superintendent, may be permitted to have one or two small tents on its campsite in addition to the main camping unit: Provided, however, That the additional units may not be ecologically detrimental to the campsite. For purposes of this section, a family camping group is defined as a parent or guardian and his or her dependent children or other minor children accompanying the adult. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-5-2 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (special projects and grants for West Virginia State Parks, State Forests, and State Rail Trails under the Division of Natural Resources, 58 CSR 34), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on September 3, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, modified by the Division of Natural Resources to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 3, 2024, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (prohibitions when hunting and trapping, 58 CSR 47), is authorized with the following amendments: On page 2, by striking out all of subsection 3.9.;And,By renumbering the remaining subsections. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on September 3, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (general hunting, 58 CSR 49), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on September 3, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (special waterfowl hunting, 58 CSR 58), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (special fishing, 58 CSR 61), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (catching and selling baitfish, 58 CSR 62), is authorized. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on September 3, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (falconry, 58 CSR 65), is authorized.The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home